Tennessee, session 114, HB1683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 54, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
54-1-105.
(a) The department of transportation is directed to study transportation
infrastructure needs, costs, and funding sources for the years 2028, 2050, and 2075.
(b) In conducting the study, the department must consider:
(1) Existing sources of revenue dedicated to transportation infrastructure,
including the highway fund;
(2) Potential sources of existing revenue not dedicated to transportation
but derived substantially from transportation activities; and
(3) The impact of Section 2 of this act on transportation infrastructure
needs.
(c) The department shall report findings and recommendations to the chairs of
the transportation and safety committee of the senate and the committee in the house of
representatives having jurisdiction over transportation by January 1, 2028.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-103, is amended by deleting
subsection (v) and substituting instead:
(v)
HB1683
010924
- 1 -

(1) As used in this subsection (v), "motor vehicle" and "tire" have the
same meanings as defined in § 67-4-1602.
(2)
(A) Notwithstanding the allocations provided for in subsection (a),
ninety-five and three thousand nine hundred seventy ten-thousandths
percent (95.3970%) of revenues received under this chapter from the
sale, use, consumption, distribution, or storage for use or consumption of
new or used motor vehicles and new or used tires on or after October 1,
2026, must be allocated to and deposited in the highway fund.
(B) Four and six thousand thirty ten-thousandths percent
(4.6030%) of revenues received under this chapter from the sale, use,
consumption, distribution, or storage for use or consumption of new or
used motor vehicles and new or used tires on or after October 1, 2026,
must be appropriated to the several incorporated municipalities within this
state to be allocated and distributed to them monthly, in the proportion as
the population of each municipality bears to the aggregate population of
all municipalities within the state, according to the latest federal census
and other censuses authorized by law. Municipalities incorporated
subsequent to the last decennial federal census shall, until the next
decennial federal census, be eligible for an allotment, commencing on
July 1, following incorporation and the election and installation of officials,
on the population basis determined under regulations of the department
of economic and community development and certified by that office to
the commissioner; provided, that an accurate census of population has
been certified to the department of economic and community
- 2 - 010924

development by the municipality. Municipalities participating in allocation
shall continue to do so on the basis of their population determined
according to law.
(3) Notwithstanding the allocation provided for in subdivision (c)(1), all
revenue generated from the tax levied at the rate of two and three quarters
percent (2.75%) on the amount in excess of one thousand six hundred dollars
($1,600) but less than or equal to three thousand two hundred dollars ($3,200)
from the sale, use, consumption, distribution, or storage for use or consumption
of new or used motor vehicles and new or used tires on or after October 1, 2026,
must be allocated to and deposited in the highway fund.
(4) Notwithstanding this subsection (v) to the contrary, no portion of the
revenue derived from the increase in the rate of sales and use tax allocated to
educational purposes, pursuant to chapter 529, § 9 of the Public Acts of 1992,
and no portion of the revenue derived from the increase in the rate of sales and
use tax from six percent (6%) to seven percent (7%), pursuant to chapter 856, §
4 of the Public Acts of 2002, must be apportioned and distributed pursuant to this
subsection (v). The revenue must be allocated as provided in chapter 529, § 9 of
the Public Acts of 1992, and chapter 856, § 4 of the Public Acts of 2002,
respectively.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect October 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 010924